data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_PT_90.aff
SFX h Y 46
SFX h   o               inha            [^cgçãi]o       +G=f,GR=dim
SFX h   a               inha            [^çgçi]a        +G=f,GR=dim
SFX h   ia              iazinha         ia              +G=f,GR=dim
SFX h   co              quinha          co              +G=f,GR=dim
SFX h   ço              cinha           ço              +G=f,GR=dim
SFX h   o               uinha           go              +G=f,GR=dim
SFX h   ca              quinha          ca              +G=f,GR=dim
SFX h   ça              cinha           ça              +G=f,GR=dim
SFX h   a               uinha           ga              +G=f,GR=dim
SFX h   á               azinha          á               +G=f,GR=dim
SFX h   ã               azinha          ã               +G=f,GR=dim
SFX h   0               zinha           ãe              +G=f,GR=dim
SFX h   0               zinha           ão              +G=f,GR=dim
SFX h   e               ezinha          [^ã]e           +G=f,GR=dim
SFX h   0               zinha           [irunl]         +G=f,GR=dim
SFX h   m               nzinha          m               +G=f,GR=dim
SFX h   o               inhas           [^cgçãi]o       +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX h   a               inhas           [^çgçi]a        +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX h   ia              iazinhas        ia              +G=f,GR=dim
SFX h   ca              quinhas         ca              +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX h   ça              cinhas          ça              +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX h   a               uinhas          ga              +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX h   co              quinhas         co              +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX h   ço              cinhas          ço              +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX h   o               uinhas          go              +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX h   á               azinhas         á               +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX h   ã               azinhas         ã               +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX h   0               zinhas          ãe              +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX h   ão              õezinhas        ão              +G=f,N=P,GR=dim
SFX h   e               ezinhas         [^ã]e           +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX h   0               zinhas          [irunl]         +G=f,N=p,GR=dim
SFX h   m               nzinhas         m               +G=m,N=p,GR=dim
SFX h   0               zona            [^ãõ][^áâéêíîoôóûúms] +G=f,GR=aum
SFX h   m               nzona           [^áâéêíîôóûú]m        +G=f,GR=aum
SFX h   s               sona            [^áâéêíîôóûú]s        +G=f,GR=aum
SFX h   o               azona           [^ã]o                 +G=f,GR=aum
SFX h   a               ona             a                     +G=f,GR=aum
SFX h   o               ona             o                     +G=f,GR=aum
SFX h   0               ona             [lsz]                +G=f,GR=aum
SFX h   0               zonas           [^ãõ][^áâéêíîoôóûúms]  +G=f,N=p,GR=aum
SFX h   m               nzonas          [^áâéêíîôóûú]m        +G=f,N=p,GR=aum
SFX h   s               sonas           [^áâéêíîôóûú]s        +G=f,N=p,GR=aum
SFX h   o               azonas          [^ã]o                 +G=f,N=p,GR=aum
SFX h   a               onas            a                     +G=f,N=p,GR=aum
SFX h   o               onas            o                     +G=f,N=p,GR=aum
SFX h   0               onas            [lsz]                +G=f,N=p,GR=aum

SFX z Y 8
SFX z   0               zinho           [^ã][eo]        +GR=dim
SFX z   0               inho            l               +GR=dim
SFX z   0               zinha           [^ã][eo]        +G=f,GR=dim
SFX z   0               inha            l               +G=f,GR=dim
SFX z   0               zinho           ão              +GR=dim
SFX z   0               zinhos          [^ã][eo]        +N=p,GR=dim
SFX z   0               inhos           l               +N=p,GR=dim
SFX z   o               ezinhos         ão              +N=p,GR=dim

SFX c Y 8
SFX c   r               ção             [ae]r           +CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao
SFX c   r               ção             [^zg]ir         +CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao
SFX c   zir             ção             zir             +CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao
SFX c   r               sição           por             +CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao
SFX c   r               ções            [ae]r           +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao
SFX c   r               ções            [^zg]ir         +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao
SFX c   zir             ções            zir             +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao
SFX c   r               sições          por             +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao

SFX C Y 6
SFX C   ionar           ção             cionar          +CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao
SFX C   ir              cção            air             +CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao
SFX C   ir              ção             uir             +CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao
SFX C   ionar           ções            cionar          +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao
SFX C   ir              cções           air             +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao
SFX C   ir              ções            uir             +CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao

SFX M Y 4
SFX M   r               mento           [ai]r           +CAT=nc,G=m,N=s,FSEM=mento
SFX M   er              imento          er              +CAT=nc,G=m,N=s,FSEM=mento
SFX M   r               mentos          [ai]r           +CAT=nc,G=m,N=p,FSEM=mento
SFX M   er              imentos         er              +CAT=nc,G=m,N=p,FSEM=mento

SFX n Y 6
SFX n   r               nte             [ae]r           +CAT=adj,G=_,N=s,FSEM=nte
SFX n   ir              ente            ir              +CAT=adj,G=_,N=s,FSEM=nte
SFX n   r               nente           or              +CAT=adj,G=_,N=s,FSEM=nte
SFX n   r               ntes            [ae]r           +CAT=adj,G=_,N=p,FSEM=nte
SFX n   ir              entes           ir              +CAT=adj,G=_,N=p,FSEM=nte
SFX n   r               nentes          or              +CAT=adj,G=_,N=p,FSEM=nte

SFX D Y 4
SFX D   r               dor             [aei]r          +CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=s,FSEM=dor
SFX D   r               dora            [aei]r          +CAT=a_nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=dor
SFX D   r               dores           [aei]r          +CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=p,FSEM=dor
SFX D   r               doras           [aei]r          +CAT=a_nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dor

SFX v Y 6
SFX v   ar              ável            ar              +CAT=adj,G=_,N=s,FSEM=vel
SFX v   er              ível            er              +CAT=adj,G=_,N=s,FSEM=vel
SFX v   ir              ível            ir              +CAT=adj,G=_,N=s,FSEM=vel
SFX v   ar              áveis           ar              +CAT=adj,G=_,N=p,FSEM=vel
SFX v   er              íveis           er              +CAT=adj,G=_,N=p,FSEM=vel
SFX v   ir              íveis           ir              +CAT=adj,G=_,N=p,FSEM=vel
