data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_PT_90.dic
aborrecer/XYPLMDv
abrandar/XYPLM
absorver/XYPLDnv
acastelar/XYPLM
acelerar/XYPLScMDnB
acidentar/XYPLcv
acirrar/XYPLMn
acolchoar/XYPLM
acomodar/XYPLScMv
acutilar/XYPLMD
adiar/XYPLMnv
adicionar/XYPLcMDv
adormentar/XYPLD
afiar/XYPLcD
afincar/XYPLMB
agendar/XYPLMR
aglomerar/XYPLcn
agradar/XYLSv
agrimensão/ph
ajuramentar/XYPLc
alagar/XYPLMD
alastrar/XYPLMD
aliar/XYPLv
alistar/XYPLM
alumiar/XYPLcMD
ameaça/ph
ameaçar/XYPLDn
amontoar/XYPLScMD
amotinar/XYPLScD
ampliar/XYPLcDv
anexar/XYPLSc
antonímia/ph
apaparicar/XYPLM
apelidar/XYPLc
apetrechar/XYPLM
aplacar/XYPLv
apostar/XYPLD
apresentar/XYPLcDnv
aprisionar/XYPLM
arar/XYPLDv
arborizar/XYPLScR
armazenar/XYPLMD
arrear/ZYPLcMD
arrelia/ph
arrepiar/XYPLMDn
arrogar/XYPLcDn
assaltar/XYPLn
assassinar/XYPLMD
assolar/XYPLcMD
astralizar/XYPLc
atarantar/XYPLcM
atender/XYPLDMv
atroar/XYPLMDn
aumentar/XYPLcDv
auspiciar/XYPLD
autobomba/ph
avassalar/XYPLDn
ave/ptz
avistar/XYPLvM
azul/pz
balizar/XYPLMD
balsamizar/XYPLc
bambueira/ph
bazofiar/XYLD
bestearia/ph
bipolarizar/XYPLnc
borracheira/ph
branquear/ZYPLcMD
cacheirada/ph
caçoar/XYPLD
calmar/XYLn
caluniar/XYPLDv
cancerar/XYPLc
cânfora/ph
cão/ez
carecer/XYLMDn
casar/XYPLSMv
cascalhada/ph
causar/XYPLDn
causticar/XYPLcn
cerrar/XYPLcM
certidão/ph
cidra/ph
circundar/XYPLcn
civilizar/XYPLcDv
coabitar/XYLcDn
coalhar/XYPLM
cólica/ph
coligar/XYPLc
combater/XYPLMnv
comerciar/YLnv
comprar/XYPLDv
conceber/XYPLMv
concentrar/XYPLcDv
concertar/XYPLDnc
condensar/XYPLcDnv
confessar/XYPLRv
confinar/XYPLcnM
conjeturar/XYPLDv
conjuntura/ph
conjurar/XYPLcDn
consignar/XYPLcDnv
consolar/XYPLcDv
contactar/XYPLnv
contaminar/XYPLcDvSn
contemporizar/XYPLcDn
contrastar/XYPLcDnv
conversar/XYPLcDv
coordenar/XYPLScDn
cornija/ph
cortar/XYPLMDn
cotar/XYPLcMDv
cravejar/XYPLMD
cromoterapia/ph
culminar/XYLcn
cumular/XYPLc
curar/XYPLDv
decepar/XYPLMD
declarar/XYPLcDnvB
defender/XYPLMnv
degradar/XYPLcMDn
delegar/XYPLcnv
demarcar/XYPLcDv
dentola/ph
depurar/XYPLcDn
derreter/XYPLM
derrotar/XYPLDv
desafiar/XYPLDn
desapegar/XYPLM
desbastar/XYPLcMD
descarregar/XYPLMD
desdenhar/XYPLDv
desentender/XYPLM
deslizar/XYLMn
deslumbrar/XYPLMDn
desnatar/XYPLc
despoetizar/XYPLcD
despojar/XYPLMD
destrinçar/XYPLDv
deturpar/XYPLcD
diabolizar/XYPLnc
dificuldade/ph
dilacerar/XYPLcMDnv
discriminar/XYPLcDnv
dispensar/XYPLcDv
divagar/XYLcDn
diversificar/XYPLDcnv
dramatizar/XYPLcSD
drenar/XYPLDv
dureza/ph
emanar/XYLcn
embalsar/XYPLM
embriagar/XYPLn
empacotar/XYPLSMD
empatar/XYPLDS
empilhar/DXYPLM
encapsular/XYPLM
encravar/XYPLScM
enfartar/XYPLM
enfeitiçar/XYPLD
enfiar/XYPLcM
engajar/XYPLMD
engolir/YPLDv
enojar/XYPLMD
ensaboadura/ph
ensaiar/XYPLMD
entrelaçar/XYPLM
envernizar/XYPLMD
enviesar/XYPLM
envolver/XYPLMn
escoar/XYcMDn
esfriar/XYPLDn
esgotar/XYPLMDnv
esguelha/ph
esmorecer/XYPLM
espelhar/XYPLcMn
esplendecer/XYLn
estafar/XYPLMDn
estimular/XYPLcDnS
estridência/ph
esvoaçar/XYLn
exalar/XYPLcn
exaltar/XYPLcMDn
excomungar/XYPLv
expectar/XYPLcDnv
explanar/XYPLD
extirpar/c
extrair/KPLv
fama/ph
feirar/XYPLn
fiar/XYPLcDv
finalidade/ph
florestar/XYPLSRc
fortificar/XYPLcDn
frase/ph
fretar/XYPLMD
fumar/XYPLDv
fundar/XYPLcMDvR
galvanizar/XYPLcDn
gargalheira/ph
gazear/ZYLDn
gráfica/ph
granizar/XYPLD
habitar/XYPLScDnv
hipnotizar/XYPLcD
hipotenusa/ph
identificar/XYPLcDv
impedir/YPLMD
imperar/XYPLDn
imposturice/ph
impregnar/XYPLc
incapacitar/XYPLvc
independência/ph
indiferenciar/XYPLcD
infetar/XYPLn
influenciar/XYPLcv
instintividade/ph
institucionalizar/XYPLc
interatuar/XYPLn
internar/XYPLcM
interrogar/XYPLcDn
invocar/XYPLcDv
irradiar/XYPLcDn
irritar/XYPLcDnv
jararaca/ph
lasanha/ph
lavar/XYPLcnMDv
lesar/XYPLDn
ligar/XYPLScMn
linguística/ph
magnanimidade/ph
magnetizar/XYPLScDnv
malquerer/PLn
manipular/XYPLcDv
marginar/XYPLcD
máscara/ph
massajar/XYPLScMn
meter/XYPLD
micra/ph
mimetizar/XYPLnc
mineralizar/XYPLcD
moldar/XYPLcDv
monta/ph
mover/XYPLMDnv
murmurar/XYPLcDn
mutilar/XYPLcDn
nata/ph
nomear/ZYPLcDn
notar/XYPLcDv
obstipação/ph
obturar/XYPLcDn
ofegar/XYLn
orar/XYLcDn
outorgar/XYPLMDn
padeira/ph
palatizar/XYPLc
panificar/XYPLcDv
pão/ez
paroquiar/XYPLM
parvalheira/ph
patinar/XYLD
pedir/YLDn
pepineira/ph
permeabilizar/XYPLc
permear/ZYPLcv
perturbar/XYPLcDnv
picar/XYPLDn
piolharia/ph
pobre/pmz
porcaria/ph
potencializar/XYPLnc
preceder/XYPLn
prescindir/XYLv
preservar/XYPLcD
proa/ph
problematizar/XYPLc
profissionalizar/XYPLnc
pronunciar/XYPLcMv
prorrogar/XYPLcDv
prosseguir/YPLcMD
purificar/XYPLcDn
quebradeira/ph
querelar/XYLDn
rapar/XYPLDn
rato/fplhG
reciclar/XYPLcv
reclamar/XYPLcDnv
recozer/XYPLM
recrescer/XYLMn
refinar/XYPLcMD
refutar/XYPLcDv
reinstalar/XYPLc
relaxar/XYPLcMDn
remissão/ph
renunciar/XYPLcDnv
reorganizar/XYPLcD
reprovar/XYPLcDv
resolver/XYPLnv
restaurar/XYPLcDv
restringir/XYPLMv
retalhar/XYPLMD
revivescer/XYPLnv
ribombância/ph
rotar/XYLcDn
roubar/XYPLD
rumorejar/XYLn
sala/ph
sanear/ZYPLMDv
senhorinha/ph
separar/XYPLcDvB
serpentear/ZYLn
sinalizar/XYPLc
sobrevida/ph
socorrer/XYPLMD
sofrer/XYPLMDv
solver/XYPLnv
subordinar/XYPLcDnvB
suportar/XYPLcvB
suspirar/XYPLDn
telhar/XYPLD
tendinite/ph
tilintar/XYLn
titubear/ZYLcn
torcer/XYPLMD
tramitar/XYPLcD
transferir/ZYPLDv
traumatizar/XYPLn
troça/ph
trocar/XYPLv
ulcerar/XYPLcv
ultrajar/XYPLDn
viajar/XYPLDn
viciar/XYPLcMDn
violar/XYPLcDv
virilha/ph
visitar/XYPLcDnvR
zumbir/XYLD
colar/DLPRXYclp
regular/BDILMPSXYcdmpv
retratar/DLPXYc
vagar/LXYclnp
